Florida, session 2026, HB1307.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
127
128 Section 1. Section 17.72, Florida Statutes, is created to
129 read:
130 17.72 Prohibition on licensing and certification of
131 unauthorized aliens.—
132 (1) The department may not issue a license or
133 certification to any person who is an unauthorized alien as
134 defined in s. 908.111(1).
135 (2) The department shall adopt rules to establish criteria
136 for verifying compliance with subsection (1) before issuing any
137 license or certificate.
138 Section 2. Paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of section
139 125.0167, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
140 125.0167 Discretionary surtax on documents; adoption;
141 application of revenue.—
142 (5)
143 (c) A county may not impose any requirement as a condition
144 to receiving any financial assistance on a borrower other than
145 requiring proof that the borrower is lawfully present in the
146 United States and that the borrower's income does not exceed 140
147 percent of the area median income. In addition to the income
148 eligibility requirement, borrowers may only be subject to loan
149 qualifications of lenders licensed to provide mortgage financing
150 as to the amount of the loan. A county may not create
Page 6 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
151 requirements that restrict participation by eligible borrowers.
152 Section 3. Section 284.52, Florida Statutes, is created to
153 read:
154 284.52 Denial of claims.—
155 (1) As used in this section, the term:
156 (a) "Adult" has the same meaning as in s. 847.001.
157 (b) "Minor" has the same meaning as in s. 847.001.
158 (c) "Unauthorized alien" has the same meaning as in s.
159 908.111(1).
160 (2) The Division of Risk Management may approve or deny
161 claims relating to an unauthorized alien who is a minor;
162 however, the division may not approve a claim submitted by an
163 unauthorized alien who is an adult or by a person who fails to
164 provide lawful documentation of his or her lawful presence in
165 the United States to the division as required by state and
166 federal law.
167 Section 4. Subsection (5) of section 322.53, Florida
168 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (6), and a new subsection
169 (5) is added to that section, to read:
170 322.53 License required; exemptions.—
171 (5) All licensing procedures, prelicensing instruction,
172 and licensing testing under this chapter must be conducted in
173 English. The use of interpreters, translators, translations, or
174 alternate language accommodations are prohibited.
175 Section 5. Section 420.56, Florida Statutes, is created to
Page 7 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
176 read:
177 420.56 Down payment assistance for unauthorized aliens
178 prohibited.—
179 (1) As used in this section, the term:
180 (a) "Down payment assistance" includes, but is not limited
181 to, grants to assist a person in the purchase of a residential
182 property which takes the form of a loan or a silent second
183 mortgage.
184 (b) "Unauthorized alien" has the same meaning as in s.
185 908.111(1).
186 (2) State and local governmental entities, the
187 corporation, and private corporations, including nonprofit
188 organizations incorporated under chapter 617, participating in
189 down payment assistance programs or silent second mortgage
190 programs may not use state or local government funds to provide
191 any form of down payment assistance to a person who is an
192 unauthorized alien.
193 (3) If a person is discovered to have been an unauthorized
194 alien at the time he or she received down payment assistance
195 funded entirely or in part by state or local government funds
196 from a state or local governmental entity, the corporation, or a
197 private corporation, the unauthorized alien must immediately
198 repay the down payment assistance to the appropriate entity or
199 corporation. If the unauthorized alien does not repay the down
200 payment assistance, the state or local governmental entity, the
Page 8 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
201 corporation, or the private corporation must initiate
202 foreclosure proceedings under chapter 702 against the
203 unauthorized alien.
204 Section 6. Section 420.5088, Florida Statutes, is amended
205 to read:
206 420.5088 Florida Homeownership Assistance Program.—There
207 is created The Florida Homeownership Assistance Program is
208 created for the purpose of assisting low-income and moderate-
209 income persons who are lawfully present in the United States in
210 purchasing a home as their primary residence by reducing the
211 cost of the home with below-market construction financing, by
212 reducing the amount of down payment and closing costs paid by
213 the borrower to a maximum of 5 percent of the purchase price, or
214 by reducing the monthly payment to an affordable amount for the
215 borrower purchaser. Loans must shall be made available at an
216 interest rate that does not exceed 3 percent. The balance of any
217 loan is due at closing if the property is sold, refinanced,
218 rented, or transferred, unless otherwise approved by the
219 corporation.
220 (1) For loans made available pursuant to s.
221 420.507(23)(a)1. or 2.:
222 (a) The corporation may underwrite and make those mortgage
223 loans through the program to persons or families who are
224 lawfully present in the United States and have incomes that do
225 not exceed 120 percent of the state or local median income,
Page 9 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
226 whichever is greater, adjusted for family size.
227 (b) Loans must shall be made available for the term of the
228 first mortgage.
229 (c) Loans may not exceed the lesser of 35 percent of the
230 purchase price of the home or the amount necessary to enable the
231 borrower purchaser to meet credit underwriting criteria.
232 (2) For loans made pursuant to s. 420.507(23)(a)3.:
233 (a) Availability is limited to nonprofit sponsors or
234 developers who are selected for program participation pursuant
235 to this subsection.
236 (b) Preference must be given to community-based
237 organizations as defined in s. 420.503.
238 (c) Priority must be given to projects that have received
239 state assistance in funding project predevelopment costs.
240 (d) The benefits of making such loans must shall be
241 contractually provided to the persons or families purchasing
242 homes financed under this subsection.
243 (e) At least 30 percent of the units in a project financed
244 pursuant to this subsection must be sold to persons or families
245 who are lawfully present in the United States and who have
246 incomes that do not exceed 80 percent of the state or local
247 median income, whichever amount is greater, adjusted for family
248 size; and at least another 30 percent of the units in a project
249 financed pursuant to this subsection must be sold to persons or
250 families who are lawfully present in the United States and who
Page 10 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
251 have incomes that do not exceed 65 percent of the state or local
252 median income, whichever amount is greater, adjusted for family
253 size.
254 (f) The maximum loan amount may not exceed 33 percent of
255 the total project cost.
256 (g) A person who is lawfully present in the United States
257 and purchases a home in a project financed under this subsection
258 is eligible for a loan authorized by s. 420.507(23)(a)1. or 2.
259 in an aggregate amount not exceeding the construction loan made
260 pursuant to this subsection. The home purchaser must meet all
261 the requirements for loan recipients established pursuant to the
262 applicable loan program.
263 (h) The corporation shall provide, by rule, for the
264 establishment of a review committee composed of corporation
265 staff and shall establish, by rule, a scoring system for
266 evaluating and ranking applications submitted for construction
267 loans under this subsection, including, but not limited to, the
268 following criteria:
269 1. The affordability of the housing proposed to be built.
270 2. The direct benefits of the assistance to the persons
271 who will reside in the proposed housing.
272 3. The demonstrated capacity of the applicant to carry out
273 the proposal, including the experience of the development team.
274 4. The economic feasibility of the proposal.
275 5. The extent to which the applicant demonstrates
Page 11 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
276 potential cost savings by combining the benefits of different
277 governmental programs and private initiatives, including the
278 local government contributions and local government
279 comprehensive planning and activities that promote affordable
280 housing.
281 6. The use of the least amount of program loan funds
282 compared to overall project cost.
283 7. The provision of homeownership counseling.
284 8. The applicant's agreement to exceed the requirements of
285 paragraph (e).
286 9. The commitment of first mortgage financing for the
287 balance of the construction loan and for the permanent loans to
288 the purchasers of the housing.
289 10. The applicant's ability to proceed with construction.
290 11. The targeting objectives of the corporation which will
291 ensure an equitable distribution of loans between rural and
292 urban areas.
293 12. The extent to which the proposal will further the
294 purposes of this program.
295 (i) The corporation may reject any and all applications.
296 (j) The review committee established by corporation rule
297 pursuant to this subsection shall make recommendations to the
298 corporation board regarding program participation under this
299 subsection. The corporation board shall make the final ranking
300 for participation based on the scores received in the ranking,
Page 12 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
301 further review of the applications, and the recommendations of
302 the review committee. The corporation board shall approve or
303 reject applicants for loans and shall determine the tentative
304 loan amount available to each program participant. The final
305 loan amount shall be determined pursuant to rule adopted under
306 s. 420.507(23)(h).
307 (3) The corporation shall publish a notice of fund
308 availability in a publication of general circulation throughout
309 this the state at least 60 days before prior to the anticipated
310 availability of funds.
311 (4) There is authorized to be established by The
312 corporation may establish with a qualified public depository
313 meeting the requirements of chapter 280 the Florida
314 Homeownership Assistance Fund to be administered by the
315 corporation according to the provisions of this program. Any
316 amounts held in the Florida Homeownership Assistance Trust Fund
317 for such purposes as of January 1, 1998, must be transferred to
318 the corporation for deposit in the Florida Homeownership
319 Assistance Fund, whereupon the Florida Homeownership Assistance
320 Trust Fund must be closed. There shall be deposited in the fund
321 moneys from the State Housing Trust Fund created by s. 420.0005,
322 or moneys received from any other source, for the purpose of
323 this program and all proceeds derived from the use of such
324 moneys. In addition, all unencumbered funds, loan repayments,
325 proceeds from the sale of any property, and any other proceeds
Page 13 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
326 that would otherwise accrue pursuant to the activities of the
327 programs described in this section shall be transferred to this
328 fund. In addition, all loan repayments, proceeds from the sale
329 of any property, and any other proceeds that would otherwise
330 accrue pursuant to the activities conducted under the provisions
331 of the Florida Homeownership Assistance Program shall be
332 deposited in the fund and may shall not revert to the General
333 Revenue Fund. Expenditures from the Florida Homeownership
334 Assistance Fund are shall not be required to be included in the
335 corporation's budget request or be subject to appropriation by
336 the Legislature.
337 (5) No more than one-fifth of the funds available in the
338 Florida Homeownership Assistance Fund may be made available to
339 provide loan loss insurance reserve funds to facilitate
340 homeownership for eligible persons.
341 Section 7. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 420.5096,
342 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
343 420.5096 Florida Hometown Hero Program.—
344 (2) The Florida Hometown Hero Program is created to assist
345 Florida's hometown workforce in attaining homeownership by
346 providing financial assistance to residents to purchase a home
347 as their primary residence. Under the program, a borrower who is
348 lawfully present in the United States may apply to the
349 corporation for a loan to reduce the amount of the down payment
350 and closing costs paid by the borrower by a minimum of $10,000
Page 14 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
351 and up to 5 percent of the first mortgage loan, not exceeding
352 $35,000. Loans must be made available at a zero percent interest
353 rate and must be made available for the term of the first
354 mortgage. The balance of any loan is due at closing if the
355 property is sold, refinanced, rented, or transferred, unless
356 otherwise approved by the corporation.
357 (3) For loans made available pursuant to s.
358 420.507(23)(a)1. or 2., the corporation may underwrite and make
359 those mortgage loans through the program to persons or families
360 who are lawfully present in the United States and who have
361 household incomes that do not exceed 150 percent of the state
362 median income or local median income, whichever is greater. A
363 borrower must be seeking to purchase a home as a primary
364 residence; must be a first-time homebuyer, and a Florida
365 resident, and lawfully present in the United States; and must be
366 employed full-time by a Florida-based employer. The borrower
367 must provide documentation of full-time employment or full-time
368 status for self-employed individuals. The requirement to be a
369 first-time homebuyer does not apply to a borrower who is an
370 active duty servicemember of a branch of the armed forces or the
371 Florida National Guard, as defined in s. 250.01, or a veteran.
372 Section 8. Subsection (18) of section 440.02, Florida
373 Statutes, is amended to read:
374 440.02 Definitions.—When used in this chapter, unless the
375 context clearly requires otherwise, the following terms shall
Page 15 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
376 have the following meanings:
377 (18)(a) "Employee" means any person who receives
378 remuneration from an employer for the performance of any work or
379 service while engaged in any employment under any appointment or
380 contract for hire or apprenticeship, express or implied, oral or
381 written, whether lawfully or unlawfully employed, and includes,
382 but is not limited to, aliens authorized for employment under
383 federal law and lawfully or unlawfully employed minors,
384 including minors who are not lawfully present in the United
385 States.
386 (b) "Employee" includes any person who is an officer of a
387 corporation and who performs services for remuneration for such
388 corporation within this state, whether or not such services are
389 continuous.
390 1. Any officer of a corporation may elect to be exempt
391 from this chapter by filing notice of the election with the
392 department as provided in s. 440.05.
393 2. As to officers of a corporation who are engaged in the
394 construction industry, no more than three officers of a
395 corporation or of any group of affiliated corporations may elect
396 to be exempt from this chapter by filing a notice of the
397 election with the department as provided in s. 440.05. Officers
398 must be shareholders, each owning at least 10 percent of the
399 stock of such corporation and listed as an officer of such
400 corporation with the Division of Corporations of the Department
Page 16 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
401 of State, in order to elect exemptions under this chapter. For
402 purposes of this subparagraph, the term "affiliated" means and
403 includes one or more corporations or entities, any one of which
404 is a corporation engaged in the construction industry, under the
405 same or substantially the same control of a group of business
406 entities which are connected or associated so that one entity
407 controls or has the power to control each of the other business
408 entities. The term "affiliated" includes, but is not limited to,
409 the officers, directors, executives, shareholders active in
410 management, employees, and agents of the affiliated corporation.
411 The ownership by one business entity of a controlling interest
412 in another business entity or a pooling of equipment or income
413 among business entities shall be prima facie evidence that one
414 business is affiliated with the other.
415 3. An officer of a corporation who elects to be exempt
416 from this chapter by filing a notice of the election with the
417 department as provided in s. 440.05 is not an employee.
418
419 Services are presumed to have been rendered to the corporation
420 if the officer is compensated by other than dividends upon
421 shares of stock of the corporation which the officer owns.
422 (c) "Employee" includes:
423 1. A sole proprietor or a partner who is not engaged in
424 the construction industry, devotes full time to the
425 proprietorship or partnership, and elects to be included in the
Page 17 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
426 definition of employee by filing notice thereof as provided in
427 s. 440.05.
428 2. All persons who are being paid by a construction
429 contractor as a subcontractor, unless the subcontractor has
430 validly elected an exemption as permitted by this chapter, or
431 has otherwise secured the payment of compensation coverage as a
432 subcontractor, consistent with s. 440.10, for work performed by
433 or as a subcontractor.
434 3. An independent contractor working or performing
435 services in the construction industry.
436 4. A sole proprietor who engages in the construction
437 industry and a partner or partnership that is engaged in the
438 construction industry.
439 (d) "Employee" does not include:
440 1. An independent contractor who is not engaged in the
441 construction industry.
442 a. In order to meet the definition of independent
443 contractor, at least four of the following criteria must be met:
444 (I) The independent contractor maintains a separate
445 business with his or her own work facility, truck, equipment,
446 materials, or similar accommodations;
447 (II) The independent contractor holds or has applied for a
448 federal employer identification number, unless the independent
449 contractor is a sole proprietor who is not required to obtain a
450 federal employer identification number under state or federal
Page 18 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
451 regulations;
452 (III) The independent contractor receives compensation for
453 services rendered or work performed and such compensation is
454 paid to a business rather than to an individual;
455 (IV) The independent contractor holds one or more bank
456 accounts in the name of the business entity for purposes of
457 paying business expenses or other expenses related to services
458 rendered or work performed for compensation;
459 (V) The independent contractor performs work or is able to
460 perform work for any entity in addition to or besides the
461 employer at his or her own election without the necessity of
462 completing an employment application or process; or
463 (VI) The independent contractor receives compensation for
464 work or services rendered on a competitive-bid basis or
465 completion of a task or a set of tasks as defined by a
466 contractual agreement, unless such contractual agreement
467 expressly states that an employment relationship exists.
468 b. If four of the criteria listed in sub-subparagraph a.
469 do not exist, an individual may still be presumed to be an
470 independent contractor and not an employee based on full
471 consideration of the nature of the individual situation with
472 regard to satisfying any of the following conditions:
473 (I) The independent contractor performs or agrees to
474 perform specific services or work for a specific amount of money
475 and controls the means of performing the services or work.
Page 19 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
476 (II) The independent contractor incurs the principal
477 expenses related to the service or work that he or she performs
478 or agrees to perform.
479 (III) The independent contractor is responsible for the
480 satisfactory completion of the work or services that he or she
481 performs or agrees to perform.
482 (IV) The independent contractor receives compensation for
483 work or services performed for a commission or on a per-job
484 basis and not on any other basis.
485 (V) The independent contractor may realize a profit or
486 suffer a loss in connection with performing work or services.
487 (VI) The independent contractor has continuing or
488 recurring business liabilities or obligations.
489 (VII) The success or failure of the independent
490 contractor's business depends on the relationship of business
491 receipts to expenditures.
492 c. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this
493 subparagraph, an individual claiming to be an independent
494 contractor has the burden of proving that he or she is an
495 independent contractor for purposes of this chapter.
496 2. A real estate licensee, if that person agrees, in
497 writing, to perform for remuneration solely by way of
498 commission.
499 3. Bands, orchestras, and musical and theatrical
500 performers, including disk jockeys, performing in licensed
Page 20 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
501 premises as defined in chapter 562, if a written contract
502 evidencing an independent contractor relationship is entered
503 into before the commencement of such entertainment.
504 4. An owner-operator of a motor vehicle who transports
505 property under a written contract with a motor carrier which
506 evidences a relationship by which the owner-operator assumes the
507 responsibility of an employer for the performance of the
508 contract, if the owner-operator is required to furnish motor
509 vehicle equipment as identified in the written contract and the
510 principal costs incidental to the performance of the contract,
511 including, but not limited to, fuel and repairs, provided a
512 motor carrier's advance of costs to the owner-operator when a
513 written contract evidences the owner-operator's obligation to
514 reimburse such advance shall be treated as the owner-operator
515 furnishing such cost and the owner-operator is not paid by the
516 hour or on some other time-measured basis.
517 5. A person whose employment is both casual and not in the
518 course of the trade, business, profession, or occupation of the
519 employer.
520 6. A volunteer, except a volunteer worker for the state or
521 a county, municipality, or other governmental entity. A person
522 who does not receive monetary remuneration for services is
523 presumed to be a volunteer unless there is substantial evidence
524 that a valuable consideration was intended by both employer and
525 employee. For purposes of this chapter, the term "volunteer"
Page 21 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
526 includes, but is not limited to:
527 a. Persons who serve in private nonprofit agencies and who
528 receive no compensation other than expenses in an amount less
529 than or equivalent to the standard mileage and per diem expenses
530 provided to salaried employees in the same agency or, if such
531 agency does not have salaried employees who receive mileage and
532 per diem, then such volunteers who receive no compensation other
533 than expenses in an amount less than or equivalent to the
534 customary mileage and per diem paid to salaried workers in the
535 community as determined by the department; and
536 b. Volunteers participating in federal programs
537 established under Pub. L. No. 93-113.
538 7. Unless otherwise prohibited by this chapter, any
539 officer of a corporation who elects to be exempt from this
540 chapter. Such officer is not an employee for any reason under
541 this chapter until the notice of revocation of election filed
542 pursuant to s. 440.05 is effective.
543 8. An officer of a corporation that is engaged in the
544 construction industry who elects to be exempt from the
545 provisions of this chapter, as otherwise permitted by this
546 chapter. Such officer is not an employee for any reason until
547 the notice of revocation of election filed pursuant to s. 440.05
548 is effective.
549 9. An exercise rider who does not work for a single horse
550 farm or breeder, and who is compensated for riding on a case-by-
Page 22 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
551 case basis, provided a written contract is entered into prior to
552 the commencement of such activity which evidences that an
553 employee/employer relationship does not exist.
554 10. A taxicab, limousine, or other passenger vehicle-for-
555 hire driver who operates said vehicles pursuant to a written
556 agreement with a company which provides any dispatch, marketing,
557 insurance, communications, or other services under which the
558 driver and any fees or charges paid by the driver to the company
559 for such services are not conditioned upon, or expressed as a
560 proportion of, fare revenues.
561 11. A person who performs services as a sports official
562 for an entity sponsoring an interscholastic sports event or for
563 a public entity or private, nonprofit organization that sponsors
564 an amateur sports event. For purposes of this subparagraph, such
565 a person is an independent contractor. For purposes of this
566 subparagraph, the term "sports official" means any person who is
567 a neutral participant in a sports event, including, but not
568 limited to, umpires, referees, judges, linespersons,
569 scorekeepers, or timekeepers. This subparagraph does not apply
570 to any person employed by a district school board who serves as
571 a sports official as required by the employing school board or
572 who serves as a sports official as part of his or her
573 responsibilities during normal school hours.
574 12. Medicaid-enrolled clients under chapter 393 who are
575 excluded from the definition of employment under s.
Page 23 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
576 443.1216(4)(d) and served by Adult Day Training Services under
577 the Home and Community-Based or the Family and Supported Living
578 Medicaid Waiver program in a sheltered workshop setting licensed
579 by the United States Department of Labor for the purpose of
580 training and earning less than the federal hourly minimum wage.
581 13. Medicaid-enrolled clients under chapter 393 who are
582 excluded from the definition of employment under s.
583 443.1216(4)(d) and served by Adult Day Training Services under
584 the Family and Supported Living Medicaid Waiver program in a
585 sheltered workshop setting licensed by the United States
586 Department of Labor for the purpose of training and earning less
587 than the federal hourly minimum wage.
588 14. An adult who is an unauthorized alien as defined in s.
589 908.111(1).
590 Section 9. Subsection (2) of section 440.10, Florida
591 Statutes, is amended to read:
592 440.10 Liability for compensation.—
593 (2) Compensation shall be payable irrespective of fault as
594 a cause for the injury, except as provided in ss. 440.09(3) and
595 440.1001 s. 440.09(3).
596 Section 10. Section 440.1001, Florida Statutes, is created
597 to read:
598 440.1001 Employer liability for injuries to unauthorized
599 aliens.—
600 (1) As used in this section, the term "unauthorized alien"
Page 24 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
601 has the same meaning as in s. 908.111(1).
602 (2) An employer who hires or employs an adult who is not
603 authorized to work in the United States under federal law is
604 personally and fully liable for all medical and treatment costs,
605 disability benefits, and death benefits compensable under this
606 chapter resulting from an injury sustained by the unauthorized
607 alien during his or her employment.
608 (3) An employer remains financially responsible and must
609 reimburse a carrier for medical and treatment costs, disability
610 benefits, and death benefits compensable under this chapter
611 resulting from an injury.
612 (4) A dispute arising out of this chapter between an
613 employer and an adult who is an unauthorized alien must be
614 adjudicated by a judge of compensation claims. Judicial review
615 of an order issued by such judge must be sought under s.
616 440.271.
617 (5) An employer who violates this section is subject to
618 the following penalties:
619 (a) A fine not to exceed $50,000 per violation. Fines
620 collected under this paragraph must be deposited into the
621 Workers' Compensation Administration Trust Fund.
622 (b) Reimbursement of any public funds expended to provide
623 medical care to the unauthorized alien.
624 (c) Revocation of the employer's business license,
625 registration, or certification issued by the appropriate
Page 25 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
626 licensing authority.
627 (6) The department shall transfer reported violations of
628 this section to the appropriate licensing authority for
629 enforcement.
630 Section 11. Section 440.1002, Florida Statutes, is created
631 to read:
632 440.1002 Employment eligibility for purposes of workers'
633 compensation eligibility.—
634 (1) As used in this section, the term "E-Verify system"
635 has the same meaning as in s. 448.095(1).
636 (2) Before an employer may submit a claim for workers'
637 compensation benefits for an employee, the employer must first
638 verify the employee's employment eligibility through the E-
639 Verify system.
640 (3) If an employer fails to check an employee's employment
641 eligibility through the E-Verify system before submitting a
642 claim for workers' compensation benefits, the employer is:
643 (a) Financially responsible for reimbursement of all
644 indemnity or medical coverage from the employer's workers
645 compensation carrier for injuries sustained by that employee.
646 (b) Personally liable for all costs, expenses, and
647 benefits that would have otherwise been covered under this
648 chapter.
649 (4) An employer must retain for 5 years a copy of the
650 documentation provided and any verification generated, if
Page 26 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
651 applicable, by the E-Verify system for each employee. The
652 employer must provide such documentation or verification to the
653 department or carrier upon request.
654 (5) This section may not be construed to bestow any
655 employment rights or legal status on an employee who is verified
656 through the E-Verify system.
657 (6) The department may adopt rules to implement and
658 enforce this section.
659 Section 12. Section 448.09, Florida Statutes, is amended
660 to read:
661 448.09 Unauthorized aliens; employment prohibited.—
662 (1) As used in this section, the term "license" has the
663 same meaning as in s. 120.52.
664 (2)(1) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly employ,
665 hire, recruit, or refer, either for herself or himself or on
666 behalf of another, for private or public employment within this
667 state, an alien who is not duly authorized to work by the
668 immigration laws of the United States, the Attorney General of
669 the United States, or the United States Secretary of the
670 Department of Homeland Security.
671 (3)(2) If the Department of Commerce finds or is notified
672 by an entity specified in s. 448.095(3)(a) that an employer has
673 knowingly employed an unauthorized alien without verifying the
674 employment eligibility of such person, the department must enter
675 an order pursuant to chapter 120 making such determination and
Page 27 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
676 require repayment of any economic development incentive pursuant
677 to s. 288.061(6).
678 (4)(3) For an employer who knowingly violates a violation
679 of this section, the department shall impose a fine not to
680 exceed $10,000 and notify any licensing agency under chapter 120
681 which issued a license to such employer. Upon receiving
682 notification under this subsection, the licensing agency must
683 suspend for 1 year any licenses held by the employer which were
684 issued by such licensing agency. Fines collected under this
685 subsection must be deposited into the State Economic Enhancement
686 and Development Trust Fund.
687 (5) For an employer who knowingly violates this section a
688 second time, the department shall impose a fine not to exceed
689 $100,000 and notify any licensing agency under chapter 120 which
690 issued a license to such employer. Upon receiving notification
691 under this subsection, the licensing agency must suspend for 5
692 years any licenses held by the employer which were issued by
693 such licensing agency. Fines collected under this subsection
694 must be deposited into the State Economic Enhancement and
695 Development Trust Fund.
696 (6) For an employer who knowingly violates this section a
697 third time, the department shall impose a fine not to exceed
698 $250,000 and notify any licensing agency under chapter 120 which
699 issued a license to such employer. Upon receiving notification
700 under this subsection, the licensing agency must permanently
Page 28 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
701 revoke any licenses held by the employer personally, as well as
702 any licenses held by the entity, if the employer is a
703 corporation, which were issued by such licensing agency. Fines
704 collected under this subsection must be deposited into the State
705 Economic Enhancement and Development Trust Fund.
706 (7)(a) For an employer who knowingly violates this section
707 and the actions of an unauthorized alien employee result in
708 injuries to another person, the department shall, at a minimum,
709 impose a fine of at least $100,000 and notify any licensing
710 agency under chapter 120 which issued a license to such
711 employer. Upon receiving notification under this paragraph, the
712 licensing agency must suspend for 5 years any licenses held by
713 the employer which were issued by such licensing agency.
714 (b) For an employer who knowingly violates this section
715 and the actions of an unauthorized alien employee result in the
716 death of another person, the department shall impose a fine not
717 to exceed $500,000 and notify any licensing agency under chapter
718 120 which issued a license to such employer. Upon receiving
719 notification under this paragraph, the licensing agency must
720 permanently revoke any licenses held by the employer which were
721 issued by such licensing agency.
722 (c) Fines collected under this subsection must be
723 deposited into the State Economic Enhancement and Development
724 Trust Fund.
725 (d) There is created a civil cause of action against an
Page 29 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
726 employer who violates this section and such violation results in
727 injuries to or the death of another person.
728 (8) Any person, including an owner, officer, agent, or
729 employee of an employer, who knowingly hires more than 50
730 unauthorized aliens commits a felony of the third degree,
731 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084,
732 and the department shall notify any licensing agency under
733 chapter 120 which issued a license to such employer. Upon
734 receiving notification under this subsection, the licensing
735 agency must permanently revoke any licenses held by the employer
736 which were issued by such licensing agency.
737 (9) A person who is injured or the next of kin, as defined
738 in s. 744.102, of a person who is killed by the actions of an
739 unauthorized alien employee may bring a cause of action under
740 subsection (7) against the employer for damages for bodily
741 injury or death place the employer on probation for a 1-year
742 period and require that the employer report quarterly to the
743 department to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of
744 subsection (1) and s. 448.095.
745 (4) Any violation of this section which takes place within
746 24 months after a previous violation constitutes grounds for the
747 suspension or revocation of all licenses issued by a licensing
748 agency subject to chapter 120. The department shall take the
749 following actions for a violation involving:
750 (a) One to ten unauthorized aliens, suspension of all
Page 30 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
751 applicable licenses held by a private employer for up to 30 days
752 by the respective agencies that issued them.
753 (b) Eleven to fifty unauthorized aliens, suspension of all
754 applicable licenses held by a private employer for up to 60 days
755 by the respective agencies that issued them.
756 (c) More than fifty unauthorized aliens, revocation of all
757 applicable licenses held by a private employer by the respective
758 agencies that issued them.
759 (10)(5) An alien who is not duly authorized to work by the
760 immigration laws of the United States, the Attorney General of
761 the United States, or the United States Secretary of the
762 Department of Homeland Security and who knowingly uses a false
763 identification document or who fraudulently uses an
764 identification document of another person for the purpose of
765 obtaining employment commits a felony of the third degree,
766 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
767 Section 13. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3), paragraph (c)
768 of subsection (5), and paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of
769 section 448.095, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
770 448.095 Employment eligibility.—
771 (3) ENFORCEMENT.—
772 (a) For the purpose of enforcement of this section, any of
773 the following persons or entities may request, and an employer
774 must provide, copies of any documentation relied upon by the
775 employer for the verification of a new employee's employment
Page 31 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
776 eligibility:
777 1. The Department of Law Enforcement;
778 2. The Attorney General;
779 3. The state attorney in the circuit in which the new
780 employee works;
781 4. The statewide prosecutor;
782 5. The Department of Financial Services; or
783 6.5. The Department of Commerce.
784 (5) PUBLIC AGENCY CONTRACTING.—
785 (c)1. A public agency, contractor, or subcontractor who
786 has a good faith belief that a person or an entity with which it
787 is contracting has knowingly violated s. 448.09(2) s. 448.09(1)
788 shall terminate the contract with the person or entity.
789 2. A public agency that has a good faith belief that a
790 subcontractor knowingly violated this subsection, but the
791 contractor otherwise complied with this subsection, shall
792 promptly notify the contractor and order the contractor to
793 immediately terminate the contract with the subcontractor.
794 3. A contract terminated under this paragraph is not a
795 breach of contract and may not be considered as such. If a
796 public agency terminates a contract with a contractor under this
797 paragraph, the contractor may not be awarded a public contract
798 for at least 1 year after the date on which the contract was
799 terminated. A contractor is liable for any additional costs
800 incurred by a public agency as a result of the termination of a
Page 32 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
801 contract.
802 (6) COMPLIANCE.—
803 (b) If the Department of Commerce determines that an
804 employer failed to use the E-Verify system as required under
805 this section three times in any 24-month period, the department
806 must impose a fine of $1,000 per day until the employer provides
807 sufficient proof to the department that the noncompliance is
808 cured. Noncompliance constitutes grounds for the suspension of
809 all licenses issued by a licensing agency subject to chapter 120
810 until the noncompliance is cured. As used in this paragraph, the
811 term "license" has the same meaning as in s. 120.52.
812 Section 14. Subsection (7) is added to section 560.208,
813 Florida Statutes, to read:
814 560.208 Conduct of business.—In addition to the
815 requirements specified in s. 560.1401, a licensee under this
816 part:
817 (7) May not initiate a foreign remittance transfer unless
818 the licensee has verified that the sender is not an unauthorized
819 alien as defined in s. 908.111(1).
820 (a) As used in this subsection, the term "foreign
821 remittance transfer" means a remittance transfer as defined in
822 the Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. s. 1693o-1, as
823 amended, the recipient of which is located in any country other
824 than the United States.
825 (b) The commission shall adopt rules relating to
Page 33 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
826 acceptable forms of documentation that a licensee must use to
827 verify that the sender of a foreign remittance transfer is not
828 an unauthorized alien. The licensee must provide confirmation of
829 verification on forms the commission prescribes. All required
830 forms must be submitted to the office by the 15th of the month
831 after the close of each calendar quarter.
832 (c) A licensee who initiates a foreign remittance transfer
833 in violation of this subsection, must pay a penalty equal to 25
834 percent of the United States dollar amount transferred,
835 excluding any fees or charges imposed by the licensee. A
836 licensee must remit to the office the amount of any penalty
837 owed, along with any forms prescribed by the office, by the 15th
838 of the month after the close of each calendar quarter.
839 Notwithstanding ss. 252.3711 and 560.144, the office must
840 deposit in the Regulatory Trust Fund the penalties collected
841 under this paragraph. Notwithstanding any other provision of
842 law, the penalty imposed in this paragraph is the only remedy
843 for a violation of this subsection and a licensee may not be
844 subject to any other penalty.
845 Section 15. Paragraphs (i) and (j) of subsection (1) of
846 section 560.211, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
847 paragraphs (j) and (k), respectively, and a new paragraph (i) is
848 added to that subsection, to read:
849 560.211 Required records.—
850 (1) In addition to the record retention requirements under
Page 34 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
851 s. 560.1105, each licensee under this part must make, keep, and
852 preserve the following books, accounts, records, and documents
853 for 5 years:
854 (i) The documentation used to verify that the sender of a
855 foreign remittance transfer, as defined in s. 560.208(7)(a), is
856 not an unauthorized alien, as defined in s. 908.111(1), and the
857 penalties paid to the office pursuant to s. 560.208(7)(c),
858 including the date and amount of each foreign remittance
859 transfer and the name, date of birth, and address of each
860 sender.
861 Section 16. Section 560.2115, Florida Statutes, is created
862 to read:
863 560.2115 Required records audit.—
864 (1) As used in this section, the term:
865 (a) "Foreign remittance transfer" has the same meaning as
866 in s. 560.208(7)(a).
867 (b) "Unauthorized alien" has the same meaning as in s.
868 908.111(1).
869 (2) For enforcement purposes, the office may at any time
870 request, and the licensee must provide, records of documentation
871 used to verify that the sender of a foreign remittance transfer
872 is not an unauthorized alien.
873 (3)(a) A person who has a good faith belief that a
874 licensee is failing to comply with s. 560.208(7) may file a
875 complaint with the office.
Page 35 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
876 (b) Upon receipt of a valid complaint of a violation of s.
877 560.208(7), which is substantiated by evidence, the office must
878 notify the licensee of the complaint and the substantiated
879 evidence and the licensee must pay the penalty under s.
880 560.208(7)(c).
881 (4) Beginning July 1, 2026, the office must conduct random
882 quarterly audits of licensees to ensure compliance with s.
883 560.208(7). During an audit, the licensee must produce to the
884 office records of documentation the licensee used to verify that
885 each sender of a foreign remittance transfer is not an
886 unauthorized alien.
887 (5) Failure to comply with subsections (1)-(4) constitutes
888 grounds for the suspension of all licenses held by the licensee
889 which were issued by the office.
890 Section 17. Subsection (2) of section 560.310, Florida
891 Statutes, is amended to read:
892 560.310 Records of check cashers and foreign currency
893 exchangers.—
894 (2) If the payment instrument is exceeds $1,000 or more,
895 the following additional information must be maintained or
896 submitted:
897 (a) Customer files, as prescribed by rule, on all
898 customers who cash corporate payment instruments that are exceed
899 $1,000 or more.
900 (b) A copy of the personal identification that bears a
Page 36 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
901 photograph of the customer used as identification and presented
902 by the customer. Acceptable personal identification is limited
903 to a valid driver license; a state identification card issued by
904 any state of the United States or its territories or the
905 District of Columbia, and showing a photograph and signature; a
906 United States Government Resident Alien Identification Card; a
907 passport; or a United States Military identification card. The
908 following may not be used as a form of personal identification:
909 1. A license or identification card issued exclusively to
910 an unauthorized alien or undocumented immigrant.
911 2. A license or identification card that is substantially
912 the same as a license or identification card issued to a United
913 States citizen or resident or others lawfully present in the
914 United States but which has markings establishing that the
915 license holder did not present proof of his or her lawful
916 presence in the United States.
917 (c) A thumbprint of the customer taken by the licensee
918 when the payment instrument is presented for negotiation or
919 payment.
920 (d) The office shall, at a minimum, require licensees to
921 submit the following information to the check cashing database
922 or electronic log, before entering into each check cashing
923 transaction for each payment instrument being cashed, in such
924 format as required by rule:
925 1. Transaction date.
Page 37 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
926 2. Payor name as displayed on the payment instrument.
927 3. Payee name as displayed on the payment instrument.
928 4. Conductor name, if different from the payee name.
929 5. Amount of the payment instrument.
930 6. Amount of currency provided.
931 7. Type of payment instrument, which may include personal,
932 payroll, government, corporate, third-party, or another type of
933 instrument.
934 8. Amount of the fee charged for cashing of the payment
935 instrument.
936 9. Branch or location where the payment instrument was
937 accepted.
938 10. The type of identification and identification number
939 presented by the payee or conductor.
940 11. Payee's workers' compensation insurance policy number
941 or exemption certificate number, if the payee is a business.
942 12. Such additional information as required by rule.
943
944 For purposes of this subsection, multiple payment instruments
945 accepted from any one person on any given day which total $1,000
946 or more must be aggregated and reported in the check cashing
947 database or on the log.
948 Section 18. Section 627.7408, Florida Statutes, is created
949 to read:
950 627.7408 Presumption of fault in motor vehicle accidents
Page 38 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
951 involving unauthorized out-of-state drivers.—
952 (1) As used in this section, the term:
953 (a) "Invalid out-of-state driver license" means a driver
954 license deemed invalid under s. 322.033.
955 (b) "Unauthorized out-of-state driver" means a person
956 operating a vehicle who has an invalid out-of-state driver
957 license.
958 (2) If an unauthorized out-of-state driver is involved in
959 a motor vehicle accident in this state, there is a rebuttable
960 presumption that the unauthorized-out-of-state driver is at
961 fault for the accident for purposes of filing an insurance
962 claim. This presumption applies regardless of the unauthorized
963 out-of-state driver's compliance with other traffic laws at the
964 time of the motor vehicle accident.
965 (3) The presumption under subsection (2) does not apply if
966 the other driver involved in the motor vehicle accident is
967 determined, by clear and convincing evidence, to be at egregious
968 fault because of, but not limited to, reckless driving in
969 violation of s. 316.192, leaving the scene of an accident in
970 violation of s. 316.027, or racing on highways in violation of
971 s. 316.191.
972 (4) The presumption established under subsection (2) may
973 be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that the
974 unauthorized out-of-state driver was not at fault based on
975 factors such as witness statements, accident reconstruction, or
Page 39 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
976 video evidence directly related to the circumstances of the
977 motor vehicle accident. The office must determine, within 5
978 business days after receipt of the evidence, whether the
979 evidence presented is sufficient to rebut the presumption.
980 (5) Upon investigation of a motor vehicle accident, a law
981 enforcement officer, as defined in s. 943.10(1), must verify
982 whether any person involved in the motor vehicle accident is an
983 unauthorized out-of-state driver or has an invalid out-of-state
984 driver license in violation of s. 322.033. If a driver is
985 determined to be in violation of s. 322.033 and he or she does
986 not qualify for an exemption under subsection (3), the law
987 enforcement officer must note the presumption of fault on the
988 Florida Traffic Crash Report, Long Form or short-form crash
989 report under s. 316.066, as applicable, and notify the
990 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles within 48 hours
991 after the accident.
992 (6) Insurers licensed under chapter 624 must apply the
993 presumption under this section in processing claims and may not
994 pay benefits to or settle claims with an unauthorized out-of-
995 state driver, unless the office has determined the presumption
996 has been rebutted. Insurers must report any suspected
997 noncompliance or rebuttal attempts by the unauthorized out-of-
998 state driver to the office within 30 days after the filing of an
999 insurance claim. An insurer that fails to comply with this
1000 subsection is subject to administrative penalties under s.
Page 40 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
1001 624.4211.
1002 (7) The Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles
1003 and the office shall adopt rules to implement this section,
1004 including standardized verification forms and procedures for
1005 interagency coordination.
1006 (8)(a) This section applies to all insurance policies
1007 issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this act and
1008 to all motor vehicle accidents occurring on or after the
1009 effective date of this act.
1010 (b) This section may not be construed to interfere with or
1011 limit a law enforcement officer's authority delegated under a
1012 287(g) agreement with United States Immigration and Customs
1013 Enforcement.
1014 Section 19. Section 655.98, Florida Statutes, is created
1015 to read:
1016 655.98 Prohibited forms of identification for state-
1017 chartered financial institutions.—
1018 (1) A state-chartered financial institution may not accept
1019 any of the following as a form of identification for the purpose
1020 of opening a deposit account, loan account, safe deposit box, or
1021 to receive any other services from a state-chartered financial
1022 institution:
1023 (a) A license or identification card issued exclusively to
1024 an unauthorized alien or undocumented immigrant.
1025 (b) A license or identification card that is substantially
Page 41 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1307 2026
1026 the same as a license or identification card issued to a United
1027 States citizen or resident or others lawfully present in the
1028 United States but which has markings establishing that the
1029 license holder did not present proof of his or her lawful
1030 presence in the United States.
1031 (2) The Office of Financial Regulation shall adopt rules
1032 to ensure compliance with, and to enforce, this section.
1033 Section 20. The Division of Law Revision is directed to
1034 replace the phrase "the effective date of this act" wherever it
1035 occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law.
1036 Section 21. This act shall take effect upon becoming a
1037 law.
Page 42 of 42
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1307-01-c1